Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2115.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5938SV (1) 91 as/js S.F. 2115 Section 1. Section 907.3, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 1 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 2 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (10) The offense is a violation of 3 section 728.12 and the minor at the time of the offense was 4 under twelve years of age or prepubescent. 5 Sec. 2. Section 907.3, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 6 by adding the following new paragraph: 7 NEW PARAGRAPH . i. The offense is a violation of section 8 728.12 and the minor at the time of the offense was under 9 twelve years of age or prepubescent. 10